Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1709
Fire protection; fire apparatus; emergency vehicles; contracts authorized.

Any city or village of this state may make arrangements and contracts with any other city or village for the purpose of fire protection and for the use of fire apparatus and emergency vehicles and equipment.

Laws 1959, c. 55, § 4, p. 249;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 96.